District of Columbia statutes.
9-1011

Nonstop flights.

An air carrier may not operate an aircraft nonstop in air transportation between Washington National Airport and another airport that is more than 1,250 statute miles away from Washington National Airport.

Oct. 30, 1986, 100 Stat. 3341-376, Pub. L. 99-591, § 6012
1981 Ed., § 7-1511.
Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 9-1001.